Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.120

Staffing, restrictions—Authority not to receive appropriated state funds.

The authority shall receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of commerce shall provide staff to the authority, to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to accomplish its purposes; the staff from the department of commerce may assist the authority in organizing itself and in designing programs, but shall not be involved in the issuance of bonds or in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to borrowers by the authority.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2064; 1998 c 245 s 51; 1994 c 238 s 3; 1989 c 279 s 13.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 238: See notes following RCW 43.163.010.